Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3604
Driving while intoxicated, implied consent refusal; not eligible for pretrial diversion.

No person charged with a violation of section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197 shall be eligible for pretrial diversion under a program established pursuant to sections 29-3601 to 29-3603 and 29-3605 to 29-3609.

Laws 1982, LB 568, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 15;

Laws 2002, LB 1303, § 4.